Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.040

City manager—Qualifications.

The city manager need not be a resident. He or she shall be chosen by the council solely on the basis of his or her executive and administrative qualifications with special reference to his or her actual experience in, or his or her knowledge of, accepted practice in respect to the duties of his or her office. No person elected to membership on the council shall be eligible for appointment as city manager until one year has elapsed following the expiration of the term for which he or she was elected.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2020; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.040. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 4; prior: (i) 1949 c 84 s 2, part; 1943 c 271 s 17, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9198-26, part. (ii) 1943 c 271 s 12, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-21, part.]